Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.490

Violations—Referral to attorney general or prosecuting attorney.

The director may refer such evidence as may be available concerning violations of this chapter or of any rule or order under this chapter to the attorney general or the proper prosecuting attorney who may in his or her discretion, with or without such a reference, institute the appropriate civil or criminal proceedings under this chapter.

[ 2011 c 336 s 566; 1982 c 69 s 20.]